Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8021.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-27.3 of the General Laws entitled "State Building Code" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following article:
ARTICLE 4
RHODE ISLAND INCLUSIVE HOME DESIGN ACT
§ 23-27.3-800. Short title.
This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Inclusive Home Design
Act.”
§ 23-27.3-801. Definitions.
As used in this article, the following terms shall have the following meanings, except where
the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Article" means the Rhode Island inclusive home design act.
(2) "American National Standards Institute (ANSI)" means the organization that facilitates
the development of American National Standards through the accreditation of the procedures of
standards developing organizations and approves their documents as American National Standards
(ANS). These documents provide technical guidelines on how to make residences accessible to
people with disabilities to varying degrees. Designers and builders use ANSI standards to
demonstrate compliance with industry best practices. Codes like the International Building Code
(IBC) reference ANSI standards.

(3) “Covered dwelling unit” is defined by §§ 23-27.3-802 and 23-27.3-803 of this article;
(4) "International Building Code (IBC)" means a comprehensive regulatory building code
that is legally enforceable standards adopted by jurisdictions. The IBC applies to general building
construction and major renovations, setting safety and welfare requirements.
§ 23-27.3-802. Visitability requirement.
(a) All new single-family construction, townhouse construction, and multi-family
construction which does not include an elevator as part of its overall design, permitted after July 1,
2027, shall include no fewer than one level that complies with the Standards for Type C (Visitable)
Units of the American National Standards Institute (ANSI') Standards for Accessible and Usable
Buildings and Facilities (section 1105 of ICC ANSI A117.1-2017). Any updates to the ANSI
Standards for Type C (Visitable) Units shall be applied to this section upon adoption by the building
code standards committee.
(b) All new multifamily construction which does include an elevator as part of its overall
design, permitted after July 1, 2027, shall provide that all units comply with the Standards for Type
C (Visitable) Units of the American National Standards Institute (ANSI) Standards for Accessible
and Usable Buildings and Facilities (section 1105 of ICC ANSI A117.1-2017). Any updates to the
ANSI Standards for Type C (Visitable) Units shall be applied to this section upon adoption by the
building code standards committee.
(c) This requirement does not apply to manufactured housing, adaptive re-use within the
existing building envelope, or redevelopment of existing buildings.
§ 23-27.3-803. Basic adaptability requirement.
(a) All new multi-family construction with two (2) or more units, permitted after July 1,
2027, shall include no fewer than one level that complies with the Standards for Type B (basic
adaptability) Units of the American National Standards Institute (ANSI) Standards for Accessible
and Usable Buildings and Facilities (section 1105 of ICC ANSI A117.1-2017). Any updates to the
ANSI Standards for Type B (basic adaptability) Units shall be applied to this section upon adoption
by the building code standards committee.
(b) This requirement does not apply to manufactured housing, adaptive re-use within the
existing building envelope, or redevelopment of existing buildings.
§ 23-27.3-804. Implementation and enforcement.
(a) In the instance that a covered dwelling unit subject to the provisions outlined by this
article, cannot comply with its requirements, in whole or in part, the aggrieved party may make an
appeal in accordance with § 23-27.3-127.1(b)(1).
(b) Local permitting authorities shall not issue a build permit for any covered dwelling
LC004864 - Page 2 of 4

units that do not comply with the applicable standards after July 1, 2027, unless the development
has received a variance and the proposed design is consistent with that variance.
(c) Local permitting authorities shall not issue a certificate of occupancy on any covered
units that do not comply with the applicable standards which were permitted after July 1, 2027,
unless the development has received a variance and the completed units are consistent with the
requirements of that variance.
(d) The standards set forth in §§ 23-27.3-802 and 23-27.3-803 are intended to supplement
and not replace other accessibility requirements. Where specific requirements in this article differ
from or conflict with other state or federal accessibility requirements, the most stringent required
accessible standard applies.
§ 23-27.3-805. Disclaimer of preemptive effect.
Nothing in this article shall limit any right, procedure, or remedy available under the
Constitution of the United States, the Rhode Island Constitution, or any other chapter of the general
laws.
§ 23-27.3-806. Severability.
If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remaining provisions of this article and the application of those provisions to other
persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004864
========
LC004864 - Page 3 of 4